static/hunspell/05.11.2023/udm.aff
FLAG long
SFX N1 0 осысьтымы/G1 [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N1 0 осысьтыд/G1 [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N1 0 осысьтыды/G1 [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N1 0 осысьтыз/G1 [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N1 0 осысьтызы/G1 [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N1 0 ёсысьтым/G1 [ьъй]
SFX N1 0 ёсысьтымы/G1 [ьъй]
SFX N1 0 ёсысьтыд/G1 [ьъй]
SFX N1 0 ёсысьтыды/G1 [ьъй]
SFX N1 0 ёсысьтыз/G1 [ьъй]
SFX N1 0 ёсысьтызы/G1 [ьъй]
SFX N1 0 ъёсысен/G1 [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # отдал.п.
SFX N1 0 осысен/G1 [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N1 0 ёсысен/G1 [ьъй]
SFX N1 0 ъёсысеным/G1 [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N1 0 ъёсысенымы/G1 [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N1 0 ъёсысеныд/G1 [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N1 0 ъёсысеныды/G1 [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N1 0 ъёсысеныз/G1 [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N1 0 ъёсысенызы/G1 [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N1 0 осысеным/G1 [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N1 0 осысенымы/G1 [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N1 0 осысеныд/G1 [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N1 0 осысеныды/G1 [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N1 0 осысеныз/G1 [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N1 0 осысенызы/G1 [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N1 0 ёсысеным/G1 [ьъй]
SFX N1 0 ёсысенымы/G1 [ьъй]
SFX N1 0 ёсысеныд/G1 [ьъй]
SFX N1 0 ёсысеныды/G1 [ьъй]
SFX N1 0 ёсысеныз/G1 [ьъй]
SFX N1 0 ёсысенызы/G1 [ьъй]
SFX N1 0 ъёсэтӥ/G1 [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # перех.п.
SFX N1 0 ъёстӥ/G1 [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N1 0 осэтӥ/G1 [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N1 0 остӥ/G1 [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N1 0 ёсэтӥ/G1 [ьъй]
SFX N1 0 ёстӥ/G1 [ьъй]
SFX N1 0 ъёстӥм/G1 [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N1 0 ъёстӥмы/G1 [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N1 0 ъёстӥд/G1 [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N1 0 ъёстӥды/G1 [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N1 0 ъёстӥз/G1 [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N1 0 ъёстӥзы/G1 [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N1 0 остӥм/G1 [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N1 0 остӥмы/G1 [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N1 0 остӥд/G1 [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N1 0 остӥды/G1 [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N1 0 остӥз/G1 [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N1 0 остӥзы/G1 [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N1 0 ёстӥм/G1 [ьъй]
SFX N1 0 ёстӥмы/G1 [ьъй]
SFX N1 0 ёстӥд/G1 [ьъй]
SFX N1 0 ёстӥды/G1 [ьъй]
SFX N1 0 ёстӥз/G1 [ьъй]
SFX N1 0 ёстӥзы/G1 [ьъй]
SFX N1 0 ъёслань/G1 [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # направ.п.
SFX N1 0 ослань/G1 [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N1 0 ёслань/G1 [ьъй]
SFX N1 0 ъёсылань/G1 [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N1 0 ъёсыдлань/G1 [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N1 0 ъёсызлань/G1 [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N1 0 ъёсмылань/G1 [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N1 0 ъёстылань/G1 [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N1 0 ъёссылань/G1 [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N1 0 осылань/G1 [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N1 0 осыдлань/G1 [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N1 0 осызлань/G1 [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N1 0 осмылань/G1 [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N1 0 остылань/G1 [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N1 0 оссылань/G1 [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N1 0 ёсылань/G1 [ьъй]
SFX N1 0 ёсыдлань/G1 [ьъй]
SFX N1 0 ёсызлань/G1 [ьъй]
SFX N1 0 ёсмылань/G1 [ьъй]
SFX N1 0 ёстылань/G1 [ьъй]
SFX N1 0 ёссылань/G1 [ьъй]
SFX N1 0 ъёсозь/G1 [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй] # предельн.п.
SFX N1 0 осозь/G1 [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N1 0 ёсозь/G1 [ьъй]
SFX N1 0 ъёсыозь/G1 [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N1 0 ъёсыдозь/G1 [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N1 0 ъёсызозь/G1 [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N1 0 ъёсмыозь/G1 [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N1 0 ъёстыозь/G1 [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N1 0 ъёссыозь/G1 [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N1 0 ъёсозям/G1 [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N1 0 ъёсозямы/G1 [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N1 0 ъёсозяд/G1 [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N1 0 ъёсозяды/G1 [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N1 0 ъёсозяз/G1 [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N1 0 ъёсозязы/G1 [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥьъй]
SFX N1 0 осыозь/G1 [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N1 0 осыдозь/G1 [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N1 0 осызозь/G1 [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N1 0 осмыозь/G1 [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N1 0 остыозь/G1 [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N1 0 оссыозь/G1 [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N1 0 осозям/G1 [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N1 0 осозямы/G1 [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N1 0 осозяд/G1 [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N1 0 осозяды/G1 [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N1 0 осозяз/G1 [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N1 0 осозязы/G1 [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]
SFX N1 0 ёсыозь/G1 [ьъй]
SFX N1 0 ёсыдозь/G1 [ьъй]
SFX N1 0 ёсызозь/G1 [ьъй]
SFX N1 0 ёсмыозь/G1 [ьъй]
SFX N1 0 ёстыозь/G1 [ьъй]
SFX N1 0 ёссыозь/G1 [ьъй]
SFX N1 0 ёсозям/G1 [ьъй]
SFX N1 0 ёсозямы/G1 [ьъй]
SFX N1 0 ёсозяд/G1 [ьъй]
SFX N1 0 ёсозяды/G1 [ьъй]
SFX N1 0 ёсозяз/G1 [ьъй]
SFX N1 0 ёсозязы/G1 [ьъй]
