static/hunspell/05.11.2023/udm.dic
ӵыж-горд/A1N1
беризё/A1N1
лызалэс-вож/A1N1
уӵыё/A1N1
кылакай/A1N1
кырньылам/A1N1
борддоръем/A1N1
микробтэм/A1N1
ултэм/A1N1
борддоръёстэм/A1N1
сютэм/A1N1
огмылкыдо/A1N1
арберилыко/A1N1
трало/A1N1
хитино/A1N1
зэмбуро/A1N1
паньсо/A1N1
муӵо/A1N1
кольтыр/A1N1
жингрес/A1N1
путырес/A1N1
пурысялэс/A1N1
пеймыт/A1N1
йӧнлы-башлы/A1N1
кӧесь-вӧесь/A1N1
огпумо/A1N1# Маша
астэргась/A1N1# С.М.
буржуазно-помещичьей/A1N1R1
антифашистской/A1N1R1
бронзовой/A1N1R1
ворошиловской/A1N1R1
гранитной/A1N1R1
духовой/A1N1R1
имущой/A1N1R1
кладовой/A1N1R1
крещённо-татарской/A1N1R1
локомобильной/A1N1R1
мещанской/A1N1R1
натуралистичной/A1N1R1
общеобразовательной/A1N1R1
ответственной/A1N1R1
пироксилиновой/A1N1R1
пӧрой/A1N1R1
пропускной/A1N1R1
рекламной/A1N1R1
сернокислой/A1N1R1
старообрядческой/A1N1R1
торжественной/A1N1R1
фасонной/A1N1R1
цирковой/A1N1R1
этической/A1N1R1
гиӟырес/D1A1N1
Бизнес-новости/J1N1
Госуслуги/J1N1
Инвожо/J1N1
Ланта-Банк/J1N1
Нефтемаш/J1N1
Рекс/J1N1
Синема/J1N1
Увамолоко/J1N1
Шатрица/J1N1
баб/N1
сьӧддурга/N1
орылика/N1
прашка/N1
чибусяська/N1
басма/N1
бекра/N1
тэтэчача/N1
тальвег/N1
туг/N1
венд/N1
нерге/N1
ӟилё/N1
лягӵуж/N1
чиргетӥсьӟоз/N1
куткулонгуби/N1
городки/N1
тули/N1
люктанни/N1
ӵушни-пашни/N1
парсьпи/N1
юси/N1
маскарчи/N1
выжонтӥ/N1
ӝабрай/N1
сборной/N1
словак/N1
калтак/N1
буркарик/N1
шток/N1
эсэдык/N1
кӧттырмостэмлык/N1
дэндорлык/N1
шакшылык/N1
обляк/N1
бурпал/N1
мускул/N1
курегкыл/N1
маял/N1
вӧськарем/N1
куажым/N1
муньылэм/N1
ӟузган/N1
ужан/N1
вукыскан/N1
кайдырлан/N1
кушман/N1
онгран/N1
кучыран/N1
сектан/N1
кисьбичан/N1
лычсузён/N1
шорин/N1
йыгдон/N1
курег-вужон/N1
бугырӟон/N1
кемскон/N1
ӝикытскон/N1
кыедаськон/N1
етӥнаськон/N1
дӥсяськон-кутчаськон/N1
шериськон/N1
тазатӥськон/N1
ӟымыртӥськон/N1
эркияськон/N1
ӵабъяськон/N1
керетэмъяськон/N1
ныръяськон/N1
сэзьяськон/N1
жильдылон/N1
ӵашйылон/N1
бурмытскылон/N1
туйнаськылон/N1
киськылон/N1
нуйтӥськылон/N1
копалляськылон/N1
йыръяськылон/N1
уймылон/N1
сюрмылон/N1
быгатылон/N1
тэтчатылон/N1
кушектылон/N1
уӵертылон/N1
урдэстылон/N1
учкытылон/N1
изьтылон/N1
вольтчылон/N1
окмон/N1
веськытомон/N1
калгаланон/N1
аздырон/N1
зыгатон/N1
ниматон/N1
ворсатон/N1
ыргетон/N1
кейӟектон/N1
ишкалтон/N1
пырпотон/N1
чикыртон/N1
поттон/N1
кылдытон/N1
сапкытон/N1
эрекчаськытон/N1
юртъяськытон/N1
тэгызомытон/N1
яратытон/N1
пичиятытон/N1
лулусьтон/N1
кужекъятон/N1
пертчон/N1
кататурын/N1
виртурын/N1
пиялаян/N1
стругаллян/N1
сьӧдмаллян/N1
пыраллян/N1
эрекчаллян/N1
медъяллян/N1
кылян/N1
серекъян/N1
пыдкуръян/N1
тодматъян/N1
вужмытъян/N1
гырлыян/N1
пенӟо/N1
чино/N1
кокчо/N1
чияп/N1
кузьыткуар/N1
исьнер/N1
мусдор/N1
кылосбур/N1
йыгыр/N1
пыр/N1
лабас/N1
ваёс/N1
силос/N1
ӝутос/N1
тылыс/N1
гибырат/N1
предмет/N1
киӵушет/N1
мерт/N1
ужъюрт/N1
поэт/N1
азау/N1
гужемпу/N1
гобеч/N1
акташ/N1
ёрыш/N1
вугы/N1
сӥтьпужы/N1
акы/N1
курмы/N1
дуры/N1
сӥтьтэчы/N1
пыдчиньы/N1
бадӟымкуӵосизь/N1
кыль/N1
куарвылнянь/N1
гондыась/N1
йылсись/N1
пӧяськытӥсь/N1
пая/N1
нюлэсотундра/N1U2
удалтытонлык/N1U2
данъетан/N1U2
мертодос/N1U2
тылбоды/N1U2
шебели/N1# Маша
пелет/N1# Маша
дургож/N1# С.М.
магинитаськем/N1# С.М.
быръёс/N1# С.М.
кертымась/N1# С.М.
автоподъёмник/N1R1
аквариум/N1R1
антитело/N1R1
атеистка/N1R1
бард/N1R1
беспорядок/N1R1
болельщик/N1R1
букварик/N1R1
ведьма/N1R1
видеоэкран/N1R1
волость/N1R1
габардин/N1R1
героиня/N1R1
год/N1R1
гострест/N1R1
губпродком/N1R1
держава/N1R1
дисбактериоз/N1R1
дрессировщица/N1R1
жаровня/N1R1
заготпункт/N1R1
зачин/N1R1
идея/N1R1
интервью/N1R1
кальций/N1R1
катамаран/N1R1
киноустановка/N1R1
ковчег/N1R1
комкор/N1R1
копирка/N1R1
краснуха/N1R1
культиватор/N1R1
легенда/N1R1
лирик/N1R1
любушка/N1R1
маслозавод/N1R1
мензурка/N1R1
минарет/N1R1
монтаж/N1R1
мученик/N1R1
народ/N1R1
непорядок/N1R1
обкомзем/N1R1
оккупант/N1R1
ортопед/N1R1
очаг/N1R1
партизанщина/N1R1
первокурсник/N1R1
петля/N1R1
платина/N1R1
подданный/N1R1
покрывало/N1R1
помреж/N1R1
правоуклонист/N1R1
припев/N1R1
промокашка/N1R1
птицевод/N1R1
радиомаяк/N1R1
ракета-носитель/N1R1
рейхстаг/N1R1
роща/N1R1
самоходка/N1R1
северюга/N1R1
сжатость/N1R1
скульптор/N1R1
совнарком/N1R1
спелеокамера/N1R1
старообрядец/N1R1
стрип/N1R1
схватка/N1R1
телеканал/N1R1
техрук/N1R1
тренаж/N1R1
турслёт/N1R1
упрям/N1R1
фельдмаршал/N1R1
форма/N1R1
хастл/N1R1
худфонд/N1R1
чересполосица/N1R1
швея/N1R1
штука/N1R1
электродеталь/N1R1
эпилог/N1R1
ялик/N1R1
аграмант/N1R2
аллод/N1R2
анафронт/N1R2
апатрид/N1R2
архар/N1R2
ацетамид/N1R2
батат/N1R2
биоцикл/N1R2
брахикефал/N1R2
валидол/N1R2
викунья/N1R2
гамма-квант/N1R2
геосфера/N1R2
гиногенез/N1R2
гониатит/N1R2
дебил/N1R2
дефлегматор/N1R2
дисбаланс/N1R2
дуодецима/N1R2
изоамплитуда/N1R2
инструменталист/N1R2
кабуки/N1R2
каприс/N1R2
квиетизм/N1R2
клипер/N1R2
компендиум/N1R2
корволант/N1R2
крузейро/N1R2
ландграф/N1R2
линкос/N1R2
мажор/N1R2
махаон/N1R2
метеопат/N1R2
митраизм/N1R2
мускардина/N1R2
нефролитиаз/N1R2
окапи/N1R2
оссеин/N1R2
парабиоз/N1R2
пелит/N1R2
пилороспазм/N1R2
пневмомикоз/N1R2
пралине/N1R2
протекционизм/N1R2
ракель/N1R2
ремиз/N1R2
романистика/N1R2
сегидилья/N1R2
симбиоз/N1R2
скэб/N1R2
спонсор/N1R2
суаре/N1R2
талион/N1R2
тет-а-тет/N1R2
трахит/N1R2
тюрингит/N1R2
фаска/N1R2
финифть/N1R2
фотокатод/N1R2
хао/N1R2
целла/N1R2
шальвар/N1R2
шпрехшталмейстер/N1R2
экспатриант/N1R2
энтомоз/N1R2
юкола/N1R2
мусульман/N1R3
вылбам/N2N1U2# ?
йырпыдэс/N8N2N1
Шошмо/T1N1
Шудӟа/T1N1
Лема/T1N1
Кыйлуд/T1N1
Васёпи/T1N1
Нюровай/T1N1
Устье-Люк/T1N1
Ильяпум/T1N1
Сыръян/T1N1
Вадор/T1N1
Гуркошур/T1N1
Ӝужгес/T1N1
Булгурт/T1N1
Алтау/T1N1
Пирнэзь/T1N1
Медла/T1N1
Косой/T2N1
Сов.-Никольской/T2N1
Будёновск/T3N1
Таллинн/T3N1
Александринск/T3N1
Антиохия-Маргиана/T3N1
Атня/T3N1
Банжул/T3N1
Бельмекен/T3N1
Богородское/T3N1
Бугуруслан/T3N1
Васькино/T3N1
Витимский/T3N1
Вюртемберг/T3N1
Гиагинская/T3N1
Гуаякиль/T3N1
Демавенд/T3N1
Должника/T3N1
Елово/T3N1
Заостровье/T3N1
Изобильное/T3N1
Йоханнесбург/T3N1
Кан/T3N1
Катаракты/T3N1
Кинешма/T3N1
Коломбо/T3N1
Котлин/T3N1
Кубань/T3N1
Кыска/T3N1
Лёхта/T3N1
Луховицы/T3N1
Мальта/T3N1
Медвенка/T3N1
Мокша/T3N1
Мысовская/T3N1
Неман/T3N1
Новомариинск/T3N1
Обихингоу/T3N1
Орисаба/T3N1
Парана/T3N1
Пиза/T3N1
Полярный/T3N1
Протвино/T3N1
Рейнланд-Пфальц/T3N1
Рыбкино/T3N1
Саратов/T3N1
Сент-Луис/T3N1
Слуцк/T3N1
Сретенск/T3N1
Сухобузимское/T3N1
Таубевская/T3N1
Тодус-Ус-Саитус/T3N1
Турки/T3N1
Уразовка/T3N1
Фарак/T3N1
Хальмер-Седе/T3N1
Хошимин/T3N1
Чегдомын/T3N1
Чоя/T3N1
Шеффилд/T3N1
Эль-Фуджайра/T3N1
Ямавзелга/T3N1
Иныльчек/T3N1
Штеттин/T3N1
нефёдовской/T7N1
бордосской/T7N1
заилийской/T7N1
лотарингской/T7N1
прикарпатской/T7N1
Урало-Тиманской/T7N1
